Alabama, session 2026rs, HB74.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
following terms have the following meanings:
(1) AGENCY. A county or municipal agency that requires
Page 1

(1) AGENCY. A county or municipal agency that requires
HB74 INTRODUCED
its law enforcement officers to be certified under the Alabama
Peace Officers' Standards and Training Commission.
(2) QUALIFYING OFFICER. A law enforcement officer
employed by and in good standing with an agency at the time of
the officer's retirement.
(b) An agency shall present a qualifying officer with
his or her agency-issued badge as part of his or her
retirement benefits.
(c) An agency may present a qualifying officer with his
or her agency-issued pistol as part of his or her retirement
benefits.
(d) If an agency chooses not to act pursuant to
subsection (c), the agency, at the time of the qualifying
officer's retirement, may offer to sell the qualifying
officer's agency-issued pistol to the qualifying officer at a
reasonable fair market price determined by the agency.
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2